Mississippi, session 2026, HB1605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Mississippi Artificial Intelligence and Stem Education Innovation Act." SECTION 2. (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Mississippi faces persistent challenges in STEM achievement, workforce readiness, and access to high-quality instructional supports, particularly in rural and underserved communities; (b)  Artificial intelligence technologies, when used responsibly, can enhancenot replaceeducators by personalizing instruction, supporting teachers, and expanding access to high-quality STEM learning; (c)  Mississippi employers increasingly require skills in science, technology, engineering, mathematics, data analysis, automation, and applied technology; (d)  Strategic, ethical deployment of artificial intelligence can strengthen Mississippi's education pipeline and economic competitiveness. (2)  The intent of the Legislature to authorize a structured, ethical, and accountable use of artificial intelligence to improve STEM education outcomes in Mississippi public schools. SECTION 3.  The following words shall have the meanings described herein: (a)  "Artificial intelligence" (AI) means computer systems or software capable of performing tasks that typically require human intelligence, including learning, pattern recognition, adaptive feedback, and data analysis. (b)  "STEM" means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics instruction aligned with Mississippi College- and Career-Readiness Standards. (c)  "AI-assisted learning tool" means an educational technology platform that uses artificial intelligence to personalize instruction, assess learning progress, or support teachers. (d)  "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Education (MDE). (e)  "Local education agency" (LEA) means a public school district or charter school authorized under Mississippi law. SECTION 4.  (1)  The Department of Education is authorized to establish the Mississippi AI and STEM Education Pilot Program. (2) The program shall allow participating LEAs to implement AI-assisted learning tools in STEM subjects for Grades 6 through 12, with priority given to: (a)  Schools identified as underperforming in math or science; (b)  Rural school districts; (c)  Schools serving a high percentage of economically disadvantaged students. (3)  Participation in the pilot program shall be voluntary. SECTION 5.  AI-assisted tools approved under this act may be used for the following purposes: (a)  Personalized tutoring and supplemental instruction in STEM subjects; (b)  Diagnostic assessments to identify learning gaps; (c)  Teacher planning support, including lesson development and formative assessments; (d)  Virtual labs, simulations, and project-based STEM learning; (e)  Career exploration and workforce pathway guidance related to STEM fields. SECTION 6.  (1)  The department shall provide or approve professional development to ensure educators understand how to effectively and ethically integrate AI tools into instruction. (2)  AI tools authorized under this act shall not be used for teacher evaluation or employment decisions. SECTION 7.  (1)  All AI-assisted learning tools must comply with: (a)  The Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA); and (b)  Applicable Mississippi student data privacy laws. (2)  Student data shall not be sold, shared, or used for noneducational purposes. (3)  The department shall develop guidelines addressing: (a)  Algorithmic bias; (b)  Transparency of AI systems; and (c)  Appropriate human oversight of AI-generated recommendations. SECTION 8.  The department, in coordination with the Mississippi Development Authority and institutions of higher learning, may encourage partnerships between LEAs and Mississippi employers to: (a)  Align AI-supported STEM instruction with workforce needs; (b)  Support internships, apprenticeships, or project-based learning; (c)  Promote high-demand STEM career pathways within the state. SECTION 9.  (1)  By December 1 of each year, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature detailing: (a)  Student academic outcomes; (b)  Teacher feedback and usage data; (c)  Cost effectiveness; (d)  Recommendations for expansion or modification. (2)  The pilot program shall sunset on June 30, 2030, unless reauthorized by the Legislature. SECTION 10.  The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this act. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.